Rhode Island, session 2025, SB298.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 31-27-1, 31-27-1.1, 31-27-2.2 and 31-27-2.6 of the General Laws
in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor Vehicle Offenses" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27-1. Driving so as to endanger, resulting in death.
(a) When the death of any person ensues as a proximate result of an injury received by the
operation of any vehicle in reckless disregard of the safety of others, including violations of § 31-
27-22, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of “driving so as to endanger, resulting in
death”.
(b) Any person charged with the commission of this offense shall upon conviction be
imprisoned for not more than ten (10) twenty (20) years and have his or her license to operate a
motor vehicle suspended for no more than five (5) years.
31-27-1.1. Driving so as to endanger, resulting in serious personal injury.
(a) When the serious bodily injury of any person ensues as a proximate result of the
operation of any vehicle in reckless disregard of the safety of others, including violations of § 31-
27-22, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of “driving so as to endanger, resulting in
serious bodily injury”.
(b) “Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or
causes serious permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any
bodily member or organ.
(c) Any person charged with a violation of this section shall upon conviction be imprisoned

for not more than five (5) ten (10) years and have his or her license to operate a motor vehicle
suspended for no more than three (3) years.
31-27-2.2. Driving under the influence of liquor or drugs, resulting in death.
(a) When the death of any person other than the operator ensues as a proximate result of an
injury received by the operation of any vehicle, the operator of which is under the influence of any
intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any
combination of these, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of “driving under the
influence of liquor or drugs, resulting in death”.
(b) Any person charged with the commission of the offense set forth in subsection (a) of
this section shall, upon conviction, be punished as follows:
(1)(i) Every person convicted of a first violation shall be punished by By imprisonment in
the state prison for not less than five (5) years and for not more than fifteen (15) thirty (30) years,
in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge, by a fine
of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) twenty
thousand dollars ($20,000) and his or her license to operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked for a
period of five (5) to ten (10) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence
satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist
which would authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the person gives proof of financial
responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.
(ii)(2) In addition, the person convicted may be required to successfully complete alcohol
or drug treatment in a program of their choice, at their own expense, as authorized by a judge of
the superior court, and may successfully complete the program before any license to operate a
motor vehicle is renewed.
(2) Every person convicted of a second or subsequent violation within a five (5) year period
in this state or any other state, provided the out-of-state conviction was based on the same blood-
alcohol concentration as set forth in § 31-27-2 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for not less than ten (10) years and for not more than twenty (20) years, in any unit of the adult
correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge, by a fine of not less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and his or her license
to operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked for a period of five (5) years. In addition, the person
convicted may be required to successfully complete alcohol or drug treatment, at their own expense,
in a program established by the director of the department of corrections. The license privilege shall
not be reinstated whether the convictions occurred in this or any other state until evidence
satisfactory to the superior court, following a hearing establishes that no grounds exist which would
LC001140 - Page 2 of 5

authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility
pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.
31-27-2.6. Driving under the influence of liquor or drugs, resulting in serious bodily
injury.
(a) When serious bodily injury of any person other than the operator is caused by the
operation of any motor vehicle, the operator of which is under the influence of any intoxicating
liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21 or any combination
of these, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of driving under the influence of liquor
or drugs, resulting in serious bodily injury.
(b) As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a
substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment
of the function of any bodily member or organ.
(c) Any person charged with the commission of the offense set forth in subsection (a) of
this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year and for
not more than ten (10) twenty (20) years and by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The sentencing judge
shall have the discretion to sentence the person to any unit of the adult correctional institutions.
The license of the person may be revoked for a period of up to two (2) three (3) to five (5) years.
The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the
division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue
a license and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this
title. In addition, the person convicted may be required to successfully complete alcohol or drug
treatment, at their own expense, in a program established by the director of the department of
corrections.
(d) For a second or subsequent conviction under this section within a five (5) year period,
a person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years nor more than fifteen
(15) years and by a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000). The sentencing judge shall have the discretion to sentence the person to any unit
of the adult correctional institutions. In addition, the person convicted may be required to
successfully complete alcohol or drug treatment, at their own expense, in a program established by
the director of the department of corrections. The license of the person may be revoked for a period
of up to four (4) years. The license privilege shall not thereafter be reinstated until evidence
satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist
which would authorize refusal to issue a license and until the person gives proof of financial
LC001140 - Page 3 of 5

responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001140
========
LC001140 - Page 4 of 5